Hawaii statutes.
§447-5 Dental hygiene school. Any
legally incorporated eleemosynary dental dispensary or infirmary, maintaining
proper standards and equipment, may establish for students a school of dental
hygiene, providing courses of study in oral hygiene. All such students, upon
entrance, shall be required to present satisfactory evidence of graduation from
a high school or its equivalent in education. They may be graduated in not
less than two years as dental hygienists, but shall not practice until licensed
as provided in this chapter. [L 1920, c 7, §4; RL 1925, §1086; RL 1935, §1004;
am L 1941, c 6, §2; RL 1945, §2185; RL 1955, §62-5; HRS §447-5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next